Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4208.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 608. As used in this act: (a) âHealth insuranceâ means insurance provided under a health insurance policy. (b) âHealth insurance policyâ means an expense-incurred hospital, medical, or surgical policy, certificate, or contract. Health insurance policy does not include a policy that provides coverage only for excepted benefits as described in 42 USC 300gg-91. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4207 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor